src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_2syll_ad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kuullâđ 1: # MLO checked
    kuullâđ+Hom1+V+Inf: kuullâđ 
    kuullâđ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulâm
    kuullâđ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuulah
    kuullâđ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kulá
    kuullâđ+Hom1+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kulâvettee 


  Verb - kuullâđ 2: # MLO checked
    kuullâđ+Hom2+V+Inf: kuullâđ
    kuullâđ+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuulâm
    kuullâđ+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuulah
    kuullâđ+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kolá
    kuullâđ+Hom2+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kulâvettee 
